Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202586-1606
Transitioning carrier; applicability of law.

Except as provided by section 86-1607, a transitioning carrier is governed by the Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act and the provisions of Chapters 75 and 86 that applied to the carrier immediately before the date the carrier was classified as a transitioning carrier. If there is a conflict between the Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act and other applicable provisions of Chapter 86, the Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act shall control.

Laws 2025, LB311, § 6.